Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1266
Commission; special rules and regulations.

The commission is hereby authorized to make special rules and regulations with reference to the operation of vessels, including waterskiing and other related activities, on any specific water or waters within the territorial limits of this state.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 66.